California statutes. Elections Code
There are basic principles of decency, honesty, and fair play which every candidate for public office in the State of California has a moral obligation to observe and uphold in order that, after vigorously contested but fairly conducted campaigns, our citizens may exercise their constitutional right to a free and untrammeled choice and the will of the people may be fully and clearly expressed on the issues.

THEREFORE:

(1) I SHALL CONDUCT my campaign openly and publicly, discussing the issues
 as I see them, presenting my record and policies with sincerity and frankness, and criticizing without fear or favor the record and policies of my opponents or political parties that merit this criticism.

(2) I SHALL NOT USE OR PERMIT the use of character defamation, whispering campaigns, libel, slander, or scurrilous attacks on any candidate or his or her personal or family life.

(3) I SHALL NOT USE OR PERMIT any appeal to negative prejudice based on a candidate’s actual or perceived race, religious creed, color, national origin, ancestry, physical disability, mental disability, medical condition, marital status, age, sexual orientation, sex, including gender identity, or any other characteristic set forth in Section 12940 of the Government Code, or association with another person who has any of the actual or perceived characteristics set forth in Section 12940 of the Government
 Code.

(4) I SHALL NOT USE OR PERMIT any dishonest or unethical practice that tends to corrupt or undermine our American system of free elections, or that hampers or prevents the full and free expression of the will of the voters including acts intended to hinder or prevent any eligible person from registering to vote, enrolling to vote, or voting.

(5) I SHALL NOT coerce election help or campaign contributions for myself or for any other candidate from my employees.

(6) I SHALL IMMEDIATELY AND PUBLICLY REPUDIATE support deriving from any individual or group that resorts, on behalf of my candidacy or in opposition to that of my opponent, to the methods and tactics that I condemn. I shall accept responsibility to take firm action against any subordinate who violates any provision of this code or the laws governing
 elections.

(7) I SHALL DEFEND AND UPHOLD the right of every qualified American voter to full and equal participation in the electoral process.
I, the undersigned, candidate for election to public office in the State of California or treasurer or chairperson of a committee making any independent expenditures, hereby voluntarily endorse, subscribe to, and solemnly pledge myself to conduct my campaign in accordance with the above principles and practices.”DateSignature

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 551, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

20441.

The Secretary of State shall print, or cause to be printed, blank forms of the code. The Secretary of State shall supply the forms to the elections officials in quantities and at times requested by the elections officials.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

20442.

The elections official shall accept, at all times prior to the election, all completed forms that are properly subscribed to by a candidate for public office and shall retain them for public inspection until 30 days after the election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

20443.

Every code subscribed to by a candidate for public office pursuant to this chapter is a public record open for public inspection.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

20444.

In no event shall a candidate for public office be required to subscribe to or endorse the code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Libel and Slander [20500. - 20502.]

20500.

The provisions of Part 2 (commencing with Section 43) of Division 1 of the Civil Code, relating to libel and slander, are fully applicable to any campaign advertising or communication.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

20501.

(a) A candidate or state measure proponent is liable for any slander or libel committed by a committee that is controlled by that candidate or state measure proponent as defined by Section 82016 of the Government Code if the candidate or state measure proponent willfully and knowingly directs or permits the libel or slander.

(b) A person who is a sponsor of a sponsored committee, as defined by Section 82048.7 of the Government Code, is liable for any slander or libel committed by the sponsored committee if the sponsor willfully and knowingly directs or permits the libel or slander.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

20502.

(a) In any action for libel or slander brought by a candidate, the willingness or unwillingness of the defendant to retract or correct a communication made in the course of a campaign, and his or her action in doing so, shall be admissible in evidence in the exemplary damages phase of a bifurcated trial.

(b) The remedy provided by this section is in addition to any other remedy provided by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Defending Democracy from Deepfake Deception Act of 2024 [20510. - 20520.]

20510.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Defending Democracy from Deepfake Deception Act of 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 261, Sec. 3.   (AB 2655)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

20511.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) California is entering its first-ever generative artificial intelligence (AI) election, in which disinformation powered by generative AI will pollute our information ecosystems like never before. Voters will not know what images, audio, or video they can trust.

(b) In a few clicks, using current technology, bad actors now have the power to create a false image of a candidate accepting a bribe or a fake video of an elections official “caught on tape” saying that voting machines are not secure, or to generate the Governor’s voice telling millions of Californians
 their voting site has changed.

(c) In the lead-up to the 2024 presidential elections, candidates and parties are already creating and distributing deepfake images and audio and video content. These fake images or files can spread to millions of Californians in seconds and skew election results or undermine trust in the ballot counting process.

(d) The labeling information required by this bill is narrowly tailored to provide consumers with factual information about the inauthenticity of particular images, audio, video, or text content in order to prevent consumer deception.

(e) In order to ensure California elections are free and fair, California must, for a limited time before and after elections, prevent the use of
 deepfakes and disinformation meant to prevent voters from voting and to deceive voters based on fraudulent content. Accordingly, the provisions of this chapter are narrowly tailored to support California's compelling interest in protecting its free and fair elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 261, Sec. 3.   (AB 2655)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

20512.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Advertisement” means any general or public communication that a large online platform knows is authorized or paid for with the purpose of supporting or opposing a candidate for elective office. 

(b) “Broadcasting station” means a radio or television broadcasting station, including any of the following:

(1) Cable operator, programmer, or producer.

(2) Streaming service operator, programmer, or producer.

(3) Direct-to-home satellite television operator, programmer, or producer.

(c) “Candidate” means any person running for
 a voter-nominated office as defined in Section 359.5, any person running for the office of President or Vice President of the United States, and any person running for the office of Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(d) “Deepfake” means audio or visual media that is digitally created or modified such that it would
 falsely appear to a reasonable person to be an authentic record of the actual speech or conduct of the individual depicted in the media.

(e) “Election communication” means a general or public communication that is not an “advertisement” and that concerns any of the following:

(1) A candidate for elective office.

(2) Voting or refraining from voting in an election in California.

(3) The canvass of the
 vote for an election in
 California, as defined in subdivision (f).

(4) Voting machines, ballots, voting sites, or other property or equipment related to an election in California.

(5) Proceedings or processes of the electoral college in California.

(f) “Election in California” means any election where a candidate, as defined in this section, is on the ballot, and any election where a statewide initiative or statewide referendum measure is on the ballot.

(g) “Elections official” means either of the following persons acting in their official capacity:

(1) An elections official as defined in Section 320.

(2) The Secretary of State.

(h) “Large online platform” means a public-facing internet website, web application, or digital application, including a social media platform as defined in Section 22675 of the Business and Professions Code, video sharing platform, advertising network, or search engine that had at least 1,000,000 California users during the preceding 12 months.

(i) (1) “Materially deceptive content” means audio or visual media that is
 digitally created or modified, and that includes, but is not limited to, deepfakes and the output of chatbots, such that it would falsely appear to a reasonable person to be an authentic record of the content depicted in the media.

(2) “Materially deceptive content” does not include any audio or visual media that contains only minor modifications that do not
 significantly change the perceived contents or meaning of the content. Minor changes include changes to the brightness or contrast of images, removal of background noise in audio, and other minor changes that do not impact the content of the image or audio or visual media.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 261, Sec. 3.   (AB 2655)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

20513.

(a) Any large online platform shall develop and implement procedures for the use of state-of-the-art techniques to identify and remove materially deceptive content if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The content is reported pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 20515.

(2) The materially deceptive content is any of the following:

(A) A candidate for elective office portrayed as doing or saying something that the candidate did not do or say and that is reasonably likely to harm the reputation or electoral prospects of a candidate.

(B) An elections official
 portrayed as doing or saying something in connection with the performance of their elections-related duties that the elections official did not do or say and that is reasonably likely to falsely undermine confidence in the outcome of one or more election contests.

(C) An elected official portrayed as doing or saying something that influences an election in California that the elected official did not do or say and that is reasonably likely to falsely undermine confidence in the outcome of one or more election contests.

(3) The content is posted during the applicable time period or periods set forth in subdivision (e).

(4) The large online platform knows or acts with reckless disregard for the fact that the content meets the requirements of this section.

(b) If a post is determined to meet the requirements for removal pursuant to subdivision (a), any large online platform shall remove the post upon that determination, but no later than 72 hours after a report is made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 20515 in order to be in compliance with this chapter.

(c) Any large online platform shall identify, using state-of-the-art techniques, and remove, upon discovering or being alerted to the posting or reposting of, any identical or substantially similar materially deceptive content that the platform had previously removed pursuant to this chapter, provided that this removal occurs during the applicable time period or periods set forth in subdivision (e).

(d) (1) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), this section does not apply to a candidate for elective office who,
 during the time period set forth in subdivision (e), portrays themself as doing or saying something that the candidate did not do or say, if the digital content includes a disclosure stating the following: “This _____ has been manipulated.” The blank in this disclosure shall be filled in with whichever of the following terms most accurately describes the media:

(A) Image.

(B) Audio.

(C) Video.

(2) (A) For visual media, the text of the disclosure shall appear in a size that is easily readable by the average viewer and no smaller than the largest font size of other text appearing in the visual media. If the visual media does not include any other text, the disclosure shall appear in a size that is easily readable by the average
 viewer. For visual media that is video, the disclosure shall appear for the duration of the video.

(B) If the media consists of audio only, the disclosure shall be read in a clearly spoken manner and in a pitch that can be easily heard by the average listener, at the beginning of the audio, at the end of the audio, and, if the audio is greater than two minutes in length, interspersed within the audio at intervals of not greater than two minutes each.

(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), any large online platform shall remove the content to the extent required by subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, and any candidate for elective office shall include the disclosure required by subdivision (d), during a period beginning 120 days before an election in California and through the day of the election.

(2) If the content described in subdivision (a) depicts or pertains to elections officials, any large online platform shall remove the content to the extent required by subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, during a period beginning 120 days before an election in California and ending on the 60th day after the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 71.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

20514.

(a) Any large online platform shall develop and implement procedures for the use of state-of-the-art techniques to identify materially deceptive content and for labeling such content as provided in subdivision (c) if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The content is reported pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 20515.

(2) The materially deceptive content is either of the following:

(A) Included within subdivision (a) of Section 20513, but is posted outside the applicable time period described in subdivision (e) of Section
 20513.

(B) Appears within an advertisement or election communication and is not subject to Section 20513.

(3) The large online platform knows or acts with reckless disregard for the fact that the materially deceptive content meets the requirements of this section.

(b) If a post is determined to meet the requirements for labeling pursuant to subdivision (a), any large online platform shall label the post
 upon that determination, but no later than 72 hours after a report is made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 20515 in order to be in compliance with this chapter.

(c) The label required by subdivision (a) shall state: “This _____ has been manipulated and is not authentic.” The blank in this disclosure shall be filled in with whichever of the following terms most accurately describes the media:

(1) Image.

(2) Audio.

(3) Video.

(d) The label required by subdivision (a) shall permit users to click or tap on it
 for additional explanation about the materially deceptive content in an easy-to-understand format.

(e) The labeling requirement set forth in subdivision (a) applies during any of the following time periods, to the extent applicable:

(1) The period beginning six months before an election in California and through the day of the election.

(2) The period beginning six months before an election in California and ending on the 60th day after the
 election, if the content depicts or pertains to elections officials, the electoral college process, a voting machine, ballot, voting site, or other equipment related to an election, or the canvass of the vote.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 261, Sec. 3.   (AB 2655)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

20515.

(a) A large online platform shall provide an easily accessible way for California residents to report to that platform content that should be removed pursuant to Section 20513 or labeled pursuant to Section 20514. The large online platform
 shall respond to the person who made the report within 36 hours of the report, describing any action taken or not taken by the large online platform with respect to the content.

(b) A candidate for elective office, elected official, or elections official who has made a report to a large online platform under subdivision (a) and who either has not received a response within 36 hours or disagrees with the response, action taken, or failure by the large online platform to take action within 72 hours, may seek injunctive or other equitable relief against the large
 online platform to compel
 the removal of specific content as required by Section 20513, labeling of specific content as required by Section 20514, or compliance with the reporting process required by subdivision (a). The plaintiff shall bear the burden of establishing the violation through clear and convincing evidence. An action under this subdivision shall be entitled to precedence in accordance with Section 35 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 261, Sec. 3.   (AB 2655)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

20516.

The Attorney General or any district attorney or city attorney may seek injunctive or other equitable relief against any large online platform to compel the removal of specific content as required by Section 20513, labeling of specific content as required by Section 20514, or compliance with the reporting process required by subdivision (a) of Section 20515. The plaintiff shall bear the burden of establishing the violation through clear and convincing evidence. An action under this section shall be entitled to precedence in accordance with Section 35 of the Code
 of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 261, Sec. 3.   (AB 2655)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

20517.

This chapter applies to materially deceptive content, regardless of the language used in the content. If the language used is not English, the disclosure required by subdivision (d) of Section 20513 and the label required by Section 20514 must appear in the language used as well as in English.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 261, Sec. 3.   (AB 2655)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

20518.

(a) This chapter does not preclude a large online platform from blocking, removing, or labeling any materially deceptive content outside of the time periods specified in Sections 20513 and 20514.

(b) This chapter does not preclude any online platform not subject to this chapter from
 blocking, removing, or labeling any materially deceptive content.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 261, Sec. 3.   (AB 2655)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

20519.

This chapter does not apply to any of the following:

(a) A regularly published online newspaper, magazine, or other periodical of general circulation that routinely carries news and commentary of general interest, and that publishes any materially deceptive content that an online platform is required to block or label based on this chapter, if the publication contains a clear disclosure that the materially deceptive content does not accurately represent any actual event, occurrence, appearance, speech, or expressive
 conduct.

(b) (1) A broadcasting station that broadcasts any materially deceptive content prohibited by this chapter as part of a bona fide newscast, news interview, news documentary, commentary of general interest, or on-the-spot coverage of bona fide news events, if the broadcast clearly acknowledges through content or a disclosure, in a manner that can be easily heard or read by the average listener or viewer, that the materially deceptive content does not accurately represent any actual event, occurrence, appearance, speech, or expressive conduct.

(2) A broadcasting station when it is paid to broadcast materially deceptive content and either of the following circumstances exist:

(A) The broadcasting station can
 show that it has prohibition and disclaimer requirements that are consistent with the requirements in this chapter and that it has provided those prohibition and disclaimer requirements to each person or entity that purchased the advertisement.

(B) Federal law requires the broadcasting station to air advertisements from legally qualified candidates or prohibits the broadcasting station from censoring or altering the message.

(c) Materially deceptive content that constitutes satire or parody.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 261, Sec. 3.   (AB 2655)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

20520.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 261, Sec. 3.   (AB 2655)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 21. STATE AND LOCAL REAPPORTIONMENT [21000. - 23004.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [21000. - 21003.]

21000.

The county elections official in each county shall compile and make available to the Legislature or any appropriate committee of the Legislature any information and statistics that may be necessary for use in connection with the reapportionment of legislative districts, including, but not limited to, precinct maps indicating the boundaries of municipalities, school districts, judicial districts, Assembly districts, senatorial districts, and congressional districts, lists showing the election returns for each precinct, and election returns for each precinct reflecting the vote total for all ballots cast, including both vote by mail ballots and ballots cast at polling places, compiled pursuant to Section 15321 in the county at each statewide election. If the county elections official stores the information and statistics in data-processing files, he or
 she shall make the files available, along with whatever documentation shall be necessary in order to allow the use of the files by the appropriate committee of the Legislature and shall retain these files until the next reapportionment has been completed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 58.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

21001.

(a) Upon receipt of certified final maps from the Citizens Redistricting Commission setting forth the district boundary lines for congressional, Senatorial, Assembly, and State Board of Equalization districts in accordance with subdivision (g) of Section 2 of Article XXI of the California Constitution, the Secretary of State shall provide an electronic copy of the maps to county elections officials. In addition, the Secretary of State shall provide an electronic copy of the entire set of maps for the Assembly to the
 Chief Clerk of the Assembly, an electronic copy of the entire set of maps for the Senate to the Senate Committee on Rules, an electronic copy of the entire set of maps for Congress to each member of the California congressional delegation, and an electronic copy of the entire set of maps for the State Board of Equalization
 to the State Board of Equalization.

(b) The Secretary of State shall also make copies of the maps available for public inspection.

(c) There shall be no charge for the maps provided pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 763, Sec. 1.   (AB 1848)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21002.

Each house of the Legislature shall be a proper party to, and, if not originally named as a party, shall have the right to intervene in, any action involving the validity or application of any statute that provides for changes in the boundaries of any legislative districts of members of that particular house.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

21003.

(a) (1) In 2030 and in each year ending in the number zero thereafter, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall furnish to the Legislature and the Citizens Redistricting Commission, in the form of a single electronic file for each database maintained by the department, information regarding each inmate incarcerated in a state correctional facility on
 the decennial Census Day. This information shall be furnished not sooner than the decennial Census Day and not later than 90 days after the decennial Census Day.

(2) The information furnished by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include the following for each inmate:

(A) A unique identifier, other than the inmate’s name or Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation number.

(B) Any information maintained by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation about the residential address or addresses at which the inmate was domiciled before the inmate’s most current term of incarceration, including any available information about the date on which each address
 was added to records maintained by the department. If the Department of
 Corrections and Rehabilitation does not have any residential address information for an inmate, the information furnished by the department shall state that fact.

(C) The inmate’s ethnicity, as identified by the inmate, and the inmate’s race, to the extent such information is maintained by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(D) The address of the state correctional facility where the inmate is incarcerated on the decennial Census Day.

(3) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall exclude all inmates in federal custody in a facility within California from the information furnished pursuant to this section.

(b) In
 order to comply with its obligation to ensure that a complete and accurate computerized database is available for redistricting in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 8253 of the Government Code, the Legislature, in coordination with the Citizens Redistricting Commission, shall ensure that the information provided by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation pursuant to subdivision (a) is included in that computerized database.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), and regardless of the form in which the information is furnished by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Legislature or the Citizens Redistricting Commission shall not publish information regarding the race, ethnicity, or prior residential addresses of specific inmates.

(d) Consistent with
 Section 2025, the Citizens Redistricting Commission shall deem each incarcerated person as residing at that person’s last known place of residence, rather than at the institution of that person’s incarceration, and shall use the information furnished to it pursuant to subdivision (a) in carrying out its redistricting responsibilities under Article XXI of the California Constitution. The Citizens Redistricting Commission shall also do all of the following when it uses information regarding inmates that is furnished pursuant to this section:

(1) Deem an inmate incarcerated in a state correctional facility for whom the last known place of residence is either outside California or cannot be determined, or an inmate in federal custody in a facility within California, to reside at an unknown geographical location in the state and
 exclude the inmate from the population count for any district, ward, or precinct.

(2) Adjust race and ethnicity data in districts, wards, and precincts that contain prisons in a manner that reflects reductions in the local population as inmates are included in the population count of the district, ward, or precinct of their last known place of residence and, to the extent practicable, those deemed to reside at an unknown geographic location.

(e) (1) For purposes of this section, “last known place of residence” means the most recent residential address of an inmate before the inmate’s most current term of incarceration that is
 sufficiently specific to be assigned to a census block, as determined from information furnished by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation in accordance with this section. In the case of an inmate for whom residential address information is available but is not sufficiently specific to allow the address to be assigned to a census block, the “last known place of residence” means a randomly determined census block located within the smallest geographical area that can be identified based on the residential address information furnished by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

 (2) For purposes of this section, “state correctional facility” means a facility under the control of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 763, Sec. 2.   (AB 1848)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Fair And Inclusive Redistricting for Municipalities And Political Subdivisions (FAIR MAPS) Act of 2023 [21100. - 21180.]

21100.

(a) This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Fair And Inclusive Redistricting for Municipalities And Political Subdivisions (FAIR MAPS) Act of 2023.

(b) In enacting this chapter, the Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The California Constitution guarantees to the people equal protection of the law and provides that the Legislature shall prohibit improper practices that affect elections.

(2) Ensuring the integrity, fairness, transparency, and accessibility of the local redistricting process is a matter of statewide
 interest and concern.

(3) Prohibiting discriminatory local redistricting practices, including racially discriminatory gerrymandering, partisan gerrymandering, and incumbency protection gerrymandering, is a matter of statewide interest and concern.

(4) Protecting the people from unrepresentative and dilutive local electoral systems is a matter of statewide interest and concern.

(5) As a result of changes to state law governing the city and county redistricting process that were included in the FAIR MAPS Act (Chapter 557 of the Statutes of 2019), the adjustment of district boundaries in cities and counties during the 2020 redistricting cycle was more transparent, participatory, and representative than in prior years.

(6) Notwithstanding these improvements to the redistricting process, research evaluating the 2020 redistricting cycle demonstrates that improvements to the FAIR MAPS Act are necessary to address ambiguities, loopholes, and deficiencies in the legislation that prevented the law’s important goals from being fully realized.

(7) This chapter addresses a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, this chapter applies to all cities, including charter cities, except as specified.

(c) The purpose of this chapter is to do all of the following:

(1) Implement the
 guarantees of the California Constitution, including Sections 2, 3, and 7 of Article I and Sections 1, 2, 3, and 4 of Article II.

(2) Ensure the integrity, fairness, transparency, and accessibility of the local redistricting process, prohibit discriminatory local redistricting practices, and protect the people from unrepresentative and dilutive local electoral systems.

(3) Establish requirements to ensure minimum standards of transparency and accessibility in the local redistricting process so that the public is able to provide information to assist their local governments in adopting fair and equitable district maps.

(4) Establish mandatory districting and redistricting criteria to promote fair and effective representation for
 all people, neighborhoods, and communities, and particularly for disadvantaged, historically marginalized, under-resourced, low-income, and underrepresented neighborhoods and communities.

(5) Establish ranked criteria that prioritize keeping whole neighborhoods and communities of interest together, facilitate political organization and constituent representation, and prohibit gerrymandering, including incumbent-protection gerrymandering.

(6) Provide a means for residents to hold their local governments accountable for conducting a fair and transparent redistricting process and adopting district maps that comply with this chapter.

(d) This chapter shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 14.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

21110.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Adopt” or “adoption” in regard to election district boundaries means the passage of an ordinance or resolution specifying those boundaries.

(b) “Applicable language” means the following:

(1) For a county or county office of education that is not a small education district, any language in which ballots are required to be provided in the county pursuant to Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503).

(2) For a city, any language that is spoken by a group of city residents with limited English proficiency who constitute 3 percent or more of the city’s total population over four years of age for whom language can be determined, as determined by the Secretary of State in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 21170.

(3) For a school district that is not a small education district, any language in which a school within the district is required to provide translated materials pursuant to Section 48985 of the Education Code.

(4) For a community college district that is not a small education district, any language that qualifies as an applicable language pursuant to paragraph (1) for a county in which the community college district is located.

(5) For a special district or a small education district, no applicable language shall be required under this chapter.

(c) “Election district” means an election district of the legislative body, including a county supervisorial district, county board of
 education trustee area, city council district, school district trustee area, community college district trustee area, or a special district governing board division.

(d) “Legislative body” means a county board of supervisors, a county board of education, a city council, a governing board of a school district, a governing board of a community college district, or a governing board of a special district.

(e) “Local jurisdiction” means a county, a county office of education, a general law city, a charter city, a school district, a community college district, or a special district.

(f) “Small education district” means any of the following:

(1) A
 county office of education in a county that has a total population of fewer than 250,000 residents, as of the most recent census.

(2) A school district serving an area that has a total population of fewer than 250,000 residents, as of the most recent census.

(3) A community college district serving an area that has a total population of fewer than 250,000 residents, as of the most recent census.

(g) “Member,” unless otherwise specified, means a member of a legislative body elected by or from districts, including a county supervisor, county board of education member, city council member, school district trustee, community college district trustee, or special district governing board member.

(h) “Districting body” means the body that has the power to adopt a legislative body’s election districts, and which may include an independent redistricting commission.

(i) “Advisory redistricting commission,” “hybrid redistricting commission,” and “independent redistricting commission” have the same meanings as those terms are defined in Section 23000, and include any commission created by a charter city that meets those definitions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 14.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

21120.

This chapter applies to a county, county office of education, general law city, charter city, school district, community college district, or special district whose legislative body is elected by districts or from districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 14.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

21130.

(a) Following or concurrent with the decision to establish district-based elections for a legislative body, or following each federal decennial census for a legislative body that is already elected using district-based elections, the districting body shall, by ordinance or resolution, adopt boundaries for all of the election districts of the legislative body so that the election districts shall be substantially equal in population as required by the United States Constitution.

(1) Population equality shall be based on the total population of residents of the local jurisdiction as determined by the most recent federal decennial census for which the redistricting data described
 in Public Law 94-171 are available.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an incarcerated person, as that term is used in Section 21003, shall not be counted towards a local jurisdiction’s population, except for an incarcerated person whose last known place of residence may be assigned to a census block in the local jurisdiction, if information about the last known place of residence for incarcerated persons is included in the computerized database for redistricting that is developed in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 8253 of the Government Code, and that database is made publicly available.

(b) The districting body shall adopt election district boundaries that comply with the United States Constitution, the California Constitution, and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52
 U.S.C. Sec. 10301 et seq.).
